Utah statutes.
41-21-3.   Minimum speed inapplicable.
The provisions of this title relating to minimum speed provisions upon
highways do not apply to vehicles properly registered under Title 41, Chapter
1a, Motor Vehicle Act while the vehicles are being driven to or from an
assembly, convention, or other meeting where the vehicles and their ownership
are of primary interest, or while they are being driven to or from, or while
on local, state, or national tours held primarily for the exhibition and
enjoyment of the vehicles by their owners, and so long as the vehicle or group
of vehicles are not operated in a manner which would constitute a public
nuisance or create a hazard to other automobiles or persons.
